Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,178
Driving upon sidewalk; prohibited; exception.

No person shall drive any vehicle upon a sidewalk except upon a permanent or duly authorized temporary driveway.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 76;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-676;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 274.